Utah statutes.
23-23-1.   Purposes.

Cooperative wildlife management units are established to:

(1)  provide income to landowners;

(2)  create satisfying hunting opportunities;

(3)  increase wildlife resources;

(4)  provide adequate protection to landowners who open their lands for hunting; and

(5)  provide access to public and private lands for hunting.

